Texas, session 891, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 141.0093 to read as follows: Sec. 141.0093.  FLOOD SAFETY REQUIREMENTS. The youth camp operator of a youth camp located on or near a body of water that is at risk of flooding must: (1)  install and maintain floodlights to guide campers to safety during an emergency; and (2)  for each cabin at the youth camp, post in a conspicuous location at or near the entrance of the cabin a sign informing campers of the procedures for safely evacuating in the event of flooding. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.